Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.180

Judge pro tempore—Appointment—Oath—Compensation.

A case in the superior court of any county may be tried by a judge pro tempore, who must be either: (1) A member of the bar, agreed upon in writing by the parties litigant, or their attorneys of record, approved by the court, and sworn to try the case; or (2) pursuant to supreme court rule, any sitting elected judge. Any action in the trial of such cause shall have the same effect as if it was made by a judge of such court. However, if a previously elected judge of the superior court retires leaving a pending case in which the judge has made discretionary rulings, the judge is entitled to hear the pending case as a judge pro tempore without any written agreement.

A judge pro tempore shall, before entering upon his or her duties in any cause, take and subscribe the following oath or affirmation:

"I do solemnly swear (or affirm, as the case may be,) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Washington, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of judge pro tempore in the cause wherein . . . . . . is plaintiff and . . . . . . defendant, according to the best of my ability."

A judge pro tempore who is a practicing attorney or who is a retired judge of a court of the state of Washington, shall receive a compensation of one-two hundred fiftieth of the annual salary of a superior court judge for each day engaged in said trial, to be paid in the same manner as the salary of the superior judge. A judge who is an active full-time judge of a court of the state of Washington shall receive no compensation as judge pro tempore. A judge who is an active part-time judge of a court of the state of Washington may receive compensation as a judge pro tempore only when sitting as a judge pro tempore during time for which he or she is not compensated as a part-time judge. A retired justice or judge may decline to accept compensation.

[ 2023 c 24 s 1; 2005 c 142 s 1; 2003 c 247 s 1; 2002 c 137 s 1; 1987 c 73 s 1; 1971 c 81 s 6; 1967 c 149 s 1; 1890 p 343 s 11; RRS s 40.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1987 c 73: "This act shall take effect January 1, 1988, if the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 7 of the state Constitution, allowing retiring judges to hear pending cases, is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November, 1987. If the proposed amendment is not so approved and ratified, this act shall be null and void in its entirety." [ 1987 c 73 s 2.] Amendment 80 of the state Constitution, amending Article IV, section 7, was approved by the voters November 3, 1987.

Judges pro tempore: State Constitution Art. 4 s 7.

appointments: RCW 2.56.170.